Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 1. Substantive Provisions.

Sec. 10.25.010.
Powers of electric or telephone cooperative; prohibited action.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, an electric or telephone cooperative may

sue and be sued in its corporate name;

have perpetual existence;

adopt a corporate seal and alter it;

construct, buy, lease, or otherwise acquire, and equip, maintain, and operate, and sell, assign, convey, lease, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of or encumber lands, buildings, structures, electric or telephone lines or systems, dams, plants and equipment, and any other real or personal property, tangible or intangible, that is necessary, convenient, or appropriate to accomplish the purpose for which the cooperative is organized;

buy, lease, or otherwise acquire, and use, and exercise and sell, assign, convey, mortgage, pledge or otherwise dispose of or encumber franchises, rights, privileges, licenses, and easements;

borrow money and otherwise contract indebtedness, and issue evidences of indebtedness, and secure the payment of the indebtedness by mortgage, pledge, or deed of trust of, or any other encumbrance upon its real or personal property, assets, franchises, or revenues;

construct, maintain, and operate electric transmission and distribution lines or telephone or related telecommunications service lines along, on, under and across publicly owned lands and public thoroughfares, including, without limitation, all roads, highways, streets, alleys, bridges, and causeways;

exercise the power of eminent domain;

become a member of other cooperatives or corporations or own stock in them;

conduct its business and exercise its powers inside or outside the state;

adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws;

make all contracts necessary, convenient, or appropriate for the full exercise of its powers;

make donations for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific, or educational purposes;

do and perform any other act and thing, and have and exercise any other power that may be necessary, convenient, or appropriate to accomplish the purpose for which the cooperative is organized.

An electric or telephone cooperative may not use cooperative funds to promote or oppose the candidacy of a candidate for director of the cooperative.

History.

(§ 4(1) ch 93 SLA 1959; am §§ 2, 3 ch 134 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, in (a)(7), added “or related telecommunications service” following “telephone”, and made minor stylistic changes.

Sec. 10.25.020.
Powers of electric cooperative.

An electric cooperative may

generate, manufacture, purchase, acquire, accumulate, and transmit electric energy, and distribute, sell, supply, and dispose of electric energy to its members, to governmental agencies and political subdivisions, and to other persons not exceeding 10 percent of the number of its members; however, a cooperative that acquires existing electric facilities may continue service to persons, not in excess of 40 percent of the number of its members, who are already receiving service from these facilities without requiring them to become members, and these persons may become members upon the terms as may be prescribed in the bylaws;

assist persons to whom electric energy is or will be supplied by the cooperative in wiring their premises and in acquiring and installing electrical and plumbing appliances, equipment, fixtures, and apparatus by financing them, and in connection with these services wire or have wired the premises, and buy, acquire, lease, sell, distribute, install, and repair electric and plumbing appliances, equipment, fixtures, and apparatus;

assist persons to whom electric energy is or will be supplied by the cooperative in constructing, equipping, maintaining, and operating electric cold storage or processing plants by financing them or otherwise;

operate a waste heat distribution system;

operate a heating distribution system that was in existence on June 9, 1988;

provide sewer, water, or gas utility service if the cooperative has received a certificate of convenience and necessity under AS

42.05.221

—

42.05.281

from the former Alaska Public Utilities Commission or the Regulatory Commission of Alaska for each type of service provided;

provide direct satellite television programming services; in this paragraph, “direct satellite television programming services” means a video broadcast signal that is received directly from a satellite by an end user.

History.

(§ 4(2) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 134 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 99 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in paragraph (6) “former Alaska Public Utilities Commission or the Regulatory Commission of Alaska” was substituted for “Alaska Public Utilities Commission” in accordance with § 30(b), ch. 25, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For legislative intent in enacting paragraphs (6) and (7) of this section, see § 1, ch. 99, SLA 1995 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 10.25.030.
Powers of telephone cooperative.

A telephone cooperative may

furnish, improve, and expand telephone or related telecommunications service to its members and to other users not in excess of 10 percent of the number of its members; however, telephone or related telecommunications service may be made available by a cooperative through interconnection of facilities to any number of subscribers of other telephone or related telecommunications systems, and through pay stations to any number of users, and a cooperative that acquires existing telephone facilities or related telecommunications facilities may continue service to persons, not exceeding 40 percent of the number of its members, who are already receiving service from the facilities without requiring them to become members, and these persons may become members on terms as may be prescribed in the bylaws;

connect and interconnect its telephone or related telecommunications service lines, facilities, or systems with other telephone or related telecommunications service lines, facilities, or systems;

make its facilities available to persons furnishing telephone or related telecommunications service inside or outside the state.

[Repealed, § 22 ch 29 SLA 2020.]

History.

(§ 4(3) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 136 SLA 1982; am §§ 5, 22 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, in (a)(1), added “or telecommunications” or variants in three places, in (a)(2), added “or related telecommunications service” twice, and once in (a)(3); repealed (b), and made stylistic changes.

Sec. 10.25.040.
Name.

The name of a cooperative must include the words “electric,” “telephone,” “telecommunications,” or “telecom,” as appropriate to its purpose, and “cooperative” or “association,” and the abbreviation “Inc.”

The name of a cooperative must be distinguishable on the records of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development from the name of any other organized entity and from a reserved or registered name. The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to implement this subsection.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not apply to a corporation that becomes subject to this chapter by compliance with AS

10.25.290

and

10.25.300

or

10.25.820

and that elects to retain a corporate name that does not comply with (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 5 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 8 ch 30 SLA 1992; am §§ 15, 16 ch 50 SLA 1999; am § 6 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in subsection (b), “Department of Community and Economic Development” was substituted for “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” in order to reconcile chs. 50 and 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

In 2012, in subsection (c), “10.25.820” was substituted for “10.25.620” to reflect the 2012 renumbering of AS

10.25.620

.

Cross references. —

For applicability of amendments to this section made by §§ 15 and 16, ch. 50, SLA 1999, see § 36(a) and (b), ch. 50, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, in (a), added “’telecommunications,’ or ‘telecom’”, “or ‘association’”, and made stylistic changes.

Sec. 10.25.050.
Incorporators.

Five or more persons, including cooperatives, may organize a cooperative.

History.

(§ 6 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.060.
Articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation of a cooperative must recite that they are executed under this chapter and must state

the name of the cooperative;

the address of its principal office;

the names and the addresses of the incorporators;

the names and addresses of its directors.

The articles may contain any provisions not inconsistent with this chapter that are considered necessary or advisable for the conduct of its business. The articles shall be signed by each incorporator and acknowledged by at least two of the incorporators, or on their behalf, if they are cooperatives. It is not necessary to recite in the articles the purpose for which the cooperative is organized or any of its corporate powers.

History.

(§ 7 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.070.
Bylaws.

The board of directors shall adopt the first bylaws of a cooperative to be adopted following an incorporation, conversion, merger, or consolidation.
Thereafter the district delegates in cooperatives having three or more districts that are not connected by a road system to another district of the cooperative may adopt, amend, or repeal the bylaws by the affirmative vote of a majority of the district delegates voting on the adoption, amendment, or repeal at a meeting of the district delegates.
In all other cooperatives the members shall adopt, amend, or repeal the bylaws by the affirmative vote of a majority of the members voting on the question.
The bylaws must set out the rights and duties of members, district delegates, and directors and may contain other provisions for the regulation and management of the affairs of the cooperative consistent with this chapter or with the articles of incorporation of the cooperative.

History.

(§ 8 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 136 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 120 SLA 1986; am § 5 ch 134 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.25.080.
Membership.

Each incorporator of a cooperative shall be a member of the cooperative or of another cooperative that is a member of it. A person may not become a member unless that person agrees to use electric energy, telephone or related telecommunications service, or other services furnished by the cooperative when they are made available through its facilities.

Membership in a cooperative is not transferrable, except as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may

prescribe additional qualifications and limitations on membership;

require membership as a condition of obtaining service from the cooperative;

provide for termination or suspension of membership; however, a membership may not be terminated unless procedures for termination are contained in the bylaws.

History.

(§ 9 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 1982; am § 6 ch 134 SLA 1988; am § 7 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, in (a), added “or related telecommunications” in the second sentence, and made a related change.

Sec. 10.25.090.
Meetings of members and district delegates.

An annual meeting of the members of a cooperative shall be conducted as provided in the bylaws of the cooperative. An annual meeting of the members of a cooperative that has been divided into districts as provided for in AS

10.25.190

may consist of separate annual meetings of the members of each district. Unless prohibited by the articles or bylaws of the cooperative, the members of a cooperative may conduct an annual meeting by teleconference or another means of communication that ensures all members participating can hear each other during the meeting.

Special meetings of the members or district delegates may be called by a majority of the board of directors or by not less than 10 percent of all members or 10 percent of all district delegates. A special meeting of the members of a cooperative that has been divided into districts as provided for in AS

10.25.190

may consist of separate special meetings of the members of each district.

An annual meeting of district delegates of a cooperative shall be conducted as provided in the bylaws of the cooperative.

History.

(§ 10(1) — (2) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 136 SLA 1968; am §§ 8, 9 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, in (a) and (c), substituted “conducted as provided in the bylaws of the cooperative” for “held at the time and place as provided in the bylaws”; and in (a), added the last sentence.

Sec. 10.25.100.
Notice of meetings.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or the articles or bylaws of a cooperative, written notice stating the time and place of each meeting of the members or district delegates shall be given to each member or district delegate, in person or by mail, electronic mail, or text message, not less than 15 days nor more than 60 days before the date of the meeting. Notice of a special meeting of the members, together with notice of the purpose for which the meeting is called, shall be given to each member or district delegate personally or by mail, electronic mail, or text message, not less than 90 days nor more than 120 days before the date of the meeting. If mailed, notice is considered given when the notice is deposited in the United States mail with postage prepaid addressed to the member or district delegate at the address of the member or delegate as the address appears on the records of the cooperative. If sent by text or electronic mail, notice is considered given when the notice is sent to the member’s telephone number, if the telephone is capable of receiving text messages, or the electronic mailing address on record with the cooperative.

History.

(§ 10(3) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 136 SLA 1968; am § 7 ch 134 SLA 1988; am § 10 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, added “or the articles or bylaws of a cooperative,” near the beginning,
substituted “in person” for “either personally” following “delegate”, added “electronic mail, or text message” twice, substituted “the notice” and “the address” for “it” in the third sentence, added the last sentence, and made stylistic changes.

Sec. 10.25.110.
Quorum requirements.

Unless the bylaws prescribe the presence of a greater percentage or number of the members for a quorum, a quorum for the transaction of business at all meetings of the members of a cooperative or the members of a district of a cooperative having not more than 1,000 members is five percent of all members, and a quorum for the transaction of business of the members of a cooperative or the members of a district of a cooperative having more than 1,000 members is 50 members. If less than a quorum is present, or considered present under (c) of this section, at a meeting, a majority of those present, or considered present under (c) of this section, may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice.

Unless the bylaws prescribe the presence of a greater percentage of the district delegates for a quorum, a quorum for the transaction of business at all meetings of the district delegates of a cooperative is 25 percent of all district delegates.

Unless prohibited by the articles or bylaws, a member or delegate who votes on a matter by electronic communication received or mail postmarked before a meeting begins is considered to have attended the meeting for the matter on which the member or delegate voted.

History.

(§ 10(4) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 136 SLA 1968; am §§ 11, 12 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, in the first sentence of (a), deleted “, present in person” following “members” twice, in the second sentence added “, or considered present under (c) or this section” twice and deleted “in person” toward the end; and added (c).

Sec. 10.25.120.
Voting.

Each member is entitled to one vote on each matter submitted to a vote of the membership. Each member of a district is entitled to one vote on each matter submitted to a vote at a district meeting. A member may not vote by proxy but may vote, if the bylaws so provide, by mail or electronic transmission, as specified by the cooperative, except that electronic transmission may not be the only allowed option for voting.

History.

(§ 10(5) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 136 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 120 SLA 1986; am § 8 ch 134 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 2010)

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent relating to the amendment of this section by sec. 8, ch. 134, SLA 1988 (SCS CSHB 394 (L&C)), see 1988 Senate Journal 3570.

Sec. 10.25.125.
Record date.

To determine the members entitled to notice of a meeting of the members or to vote on a matter that is to be submitted to a vote of the members, or for any other proper purpose, the board of directors may fix a date that occurs not more than 30 days before the date of notice or distribution of mail or electronic ballots as the record date for the determination. If a record date is not fixed for the determination of members entitled to notice of a meeting or to vote on a matter, the date on which notice of the meeting or of mail or electronic voting is first distributed is the record date. When a determination of members entitled to vote at a meeting is made, the determination applies until the meeting is adjourned sine die.

History.

(§ 9 ch 134 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 28 SLA 2010)

Sec. 10.25.130.
Waiver of notice.

A person entitled to notice of a meeting may waive notice in writing either before or after the meeting. Attendance at a meeting is a waiver of notice of the meeting, unless the person attends solely to object to the transaction of business because the meeting has not been legally called or convened.

History.

(§ 11 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.140.
Board of directors.

The business of a cooperative shall be managed by a board of not less than five directors, each of whom shall be a member of the cooperative or of another cooperative which is a member of it.
The bylaws shall prescribe the number of directors, their qualifications other than those prescribed in this chapter, and the manner of holding meetings of the board of directors and of electing successors to directors who resign, die, or are otherwise incapable of acting. The bylaws shall provide for the removal of directors from office for cause and for the election of their successors.
Directors may not receive salaries for the services as directors and, except in emergencies, may not receive salaries for their services in any other capacity without the approval of the members.
The bylaws may, however, prescribe a fixed fee for each day of attendance at a meeting of the board of directors or other meeting while officially representing the cooperative and for each day of necessary travel to and from a meeting of the board of directors or other meeting while officially representing the cooperative and may provide for insurance and reimbursement of actual expenses incurred while performing duties as a director.

History.

(§ 12(1) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 10 ch 134 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.25.145.
Liability, indemnification, and insurance.

A protected person is not individually liable for conduct performed within the scope of the person’s duties for the cooperative. However, the protected person may be held individually liable for conduct if it was not reasonable for the person to believe that the conduct was in, or not contrary to, the best interests of the cooperative.

Unless prohibited by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, the cooperative shall indemnify a protected person who is or may be made a party to a contested matter against expenses actually and reasonably incurred in connection with the contested matter. However, the cooperative may not indemnify the protected person if the person did not reasonably believe the conduct to be in, or not opposed to, the best interests of the cooperative. With respect to a criminal action or proceeding, the cooperative shall indemnify a protected person unless the person had reasonable cause to believe that the conduct was unlawful.

A cooperative may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of a protected person against liability asserted against the protected person and incurred in an official capacity or arising out of the person’s status, whether or not the cooperative would have the power to indemnify the person against the liability under this section.

In this section,

“conduct” includes action, inaction, and omission;

“contested matter” means a proposed, pending, or completed action or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative;

“expenses” include attorney fees, judgments, fines, and amounts paid in settlement;

“protected person” means a director, officer, employee, or agent of a cooperative.

History.

(§ 11 ch 134 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.25.150.
Term of office of directors.

The directors of a cooperative named in articles of incorporation, consolidation, merger, or conversion hold office until the next annual meeting of the members and until their successors are elected and qualify. Each elected director holds office for the term for which elected and until a successor is elected and qualifies.

History.

(§ 12(2) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 12 ch 134 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.25.160.
Staggered terms of office for directors.

Instead of electing all directors annually, the bylaws may provide that directors shall be elected for terms not to exceed four years, or until their successors are elected and qualify, and that the terms of directors shall be staggered so that not all terms expire at the same time.

History.

(§ 12(3) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 13 ch 134 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.25.170.
Quorum of board.

A majority of the board of directors constitutes a quorum.

History.

(§ 12(4) ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.175.
Board meetings open; exceptions; notice; remedy.

A meeting of the board of directors may be attended by members of the cooperative. Except when voice votes are authorized, a vote shall be conducted in such a manner that the members may know the vote of each person entitled to vote. The board of directors may conduct a meeting by teleconference, or another means of communication that ensures all participating directors can hear each other during the meeting, if the board gives reasonable notice of the meeting and if members of the cooperative are able to attend the meeting sites and hear the meeting. This section applies only to a meeting at which a quorum of the board participates.

If excepted subjects are to be discussed at a meeting, the meeting must first be convened as a regular or special meeting and the question of holding an executive session to discuss matters that come within the exceptions contained in (c) of this section shall be determined by a majority vote of the board. No subjects may be considered at the executive session except those mentioned in the motion calling for the executive session unless auxiliary to the main question. Formal action may not be taken during the executive session.

The following excepted subjects may be discussed in an executive session:

matters the immediate knowledge of which would clearly have an adverse effect on the finances of the cooperative;

subjects that tend to prejudice the reputation and character of a person; however, the person may request a public discussion;

matters discussed with an attorney for the cooperative, the immediate knowledge of which could have an adverse effect on the legal position of the cooperative;

personnel matters.

Notice shall be given for all regular or special meetings of the board of directors as provided in the bylaws of the cooperative.

A member affected by action taken contrary to this section may bring a suit in the superior court. The court may order appropriate equitable relief after considering the circumstances of the case. Action taken contrary to this section is not void if other equitable relief is available and appropriate.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 1982; am §§ 14, 15 ch 134 SLA 1988; am §§ 13, 14 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, in the third sentence of (a), substituted “, or other means of communication that ensures all participating directors can hear each other during the meeting” for “or similar communications equipment”; and added (c)(4).

Sec. 10.25.180.
General powers of board.

The board of directors may exercise all of the powers of a cooperative not conferred upon the members by this chapter, its articles of incorporation, or its bylaws.

History.

(§ 12(5) ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.190.
Districts.

The bylaws may provide for the division of the territory served or to be served by a cooperative into two or more districts for any purpose, including, without limitation, the nomination and election of directors and the election and functioning of district delegates. These delegates, who shall be members, may nominate and elect directors. The bylaws shall prescribe the boundaries of the districts, or the manner of establishing the boundaries, and the manner of changing the boundaries, and the manner in which the districts function. A member at any district meeting and a district delegate at any meeting may not vote by proxy, by mail, or by electronic transmission. However, the election of directors shall be by mail or, if the bylaws so provide, by electronic transmission, as specified by the cooperative, except that electronic transmission may not be the only allowed option for voting.

History.

(§ 13 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 136 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 28 SLA 2010)

Sec. 10.25.200.
Officers, agents, and employees.

The officers of a cooperative are those officers authorized by the bylaws. The officers shall be elected annually by the board of directors from among its members. If authorized by the bylaws, the election may be conducted by written ballot. When a person holding an office ceases to be a director, that person ceases to hold office. The board of directors may appoint those other agents or employees that it considers necessary or advisable and shall prescribe their powers and duties. An officer may be removed from office and a successor elected in the manner prescribed in the bylaws.

History.

(§ 14 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 99 SLA 1995)

Sec. 10.25.210.
Amendment of articles of incorporation.

A cooperative may amend its articles of incorporation as follows, except that it may change the location of its principal office in the manner set out in AS

10.25.230

:

the proposed amendment shall be presented to the members or district delegates at a meeting or by written notice; if the proposed amendment is presented at a meeting, the notice of the meeting must set out or have attached to it the proposed amendment;

if the proposed amendment, with any changes, is approved by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds of those members or district delegates voting on it, the presiding officer of the board of directors shall execute and acknowledge articles of amendment on behalf of the cooperative, and the officer designated by the board shall affix and attest to the seal of the cooperative; if the cooperative accepts ballots both at a meeting and by mail or by electronic transmission, a member may vote by mail, by electronic transmission, or at the meeting, as specified by the cooperative, except that electronic transmission may not be the only allowed option for voting.

History.

(§ 15 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 5 ch 136 SLA 1968; am § 4 ch 99 SLA 1995; am § 4 ch 28 SLA 2010)

Sec. 10.25.220.
Contents of articles of amendment.

The articles of amendment must recite that they are executed under this chapter and must state

the name of the cooperative;

the address of its principal office;

the amendment to its articles of incorporation.

The presiding officer executing the articles of amendment shall make and annex to them an affidavit stating that the provisions of AS

10.25.210

and this section regarding the amendment were complied with.

History.

(§ 15 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 5 ch 99 SLA 1995; am § 18 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Sec. 10.25.230.
Change of location of principal office.

A cooperative may, upon authorization of its board of directors or its members, change the location of its principal office by filing a certificate reciting the change of principal office, executed and acknowledged by its presiding officer under its seal, attested by the officer designated by the board, in the office of the commissioner.

History.

(§ 16 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 6 ch 99 SLA 1995)

Sec. 10.25.235.
Member’s right to examine books and records.

A member of a cooperative may, at a reasonable time and for a proper purpose, examine and make copies of the books and records of the cooperative at the principal office of the cooperative. The cooperative may charge a member an amount equal to the actual cost of duplicating documents requested under this section. The cooperative may withhold books and records concerning specific matters that were prepared for or during an executive session under AS

10.25.175(c)

and not subsequently made public by the cooperative. The cooperative may also withhold the identity of public information that was referred to during the executive session.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 1982; am § 16 ch 134 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 10.25.176.
Renumbered in 1982.